Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-427
Actuarial opinions; rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of sections 44-420 to 44-427.

Laws 1994, LB 978, § 14.